Maryland, session 2025, HB1272.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) There is a Youth Sports Safety Advisory Commission.
(b) The Commission consists of the following members:
(1) one member of the Senate of Maryland, appointed by the President of
the Senate;
(2) one member of the House of Delegates, appointed by the Speaker of the
House;
(3) the State Superintendent of Schools, or the State Superintendent’s
designee; and
(4) the following members who have experience with youth sports safety or
treating youth sports injuries, appointed by the Governor:
(i) one representative of the Maryland Chapter of the American
Academy of Pediatrics;
(ii) one representative of the Maryland Academy of Family
Physicians;
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1272*

HOUSE BILL 1272
(iii) one representative of the Society of Pediatric Psychology;
(iv) one representative of the Maryland Psychological Association;
(v) one representative of the American Academy of Clinical
Neuropsychology;
(vi) one representative of the Maryland Athletic Trainers
Association;
(vii) one representative of the Maryland Public Secondary Schools
Athletic Association who is a coach;
(viii) one representative of the Maryland Board of Football Officials;
(ix) one representative of the Mid–Atlantic Sports Turf Managers
Association;
(x) one representative of the Maryland Association of County Park
and Recreation Administrators;
(xi) one representative of the Medical Mutual Liability Insurance
Society of Maryland who is a risk management specialist;
(xii) one pediatrician or family medicine practitioner;
(xiii) one orthopedist;
(xiv) one emergency medicine physician who treats pediatric patients;
(xv) one pediatric cardiologist;
(xvi) one public health epidemiologist; and
(xvii) one physical therapist.
(c) The Governor shall designate the chair of the Commission.
(d) (1) The Commission shall meet at least twice a year, at the times and
places that the Commission determines.
(2) The chair of the Commission may make the determination that more
frequent meetings are necessary.
(e) The Maryland Department of Health shall provide staff for the Commission.
(f) A member of the Commission:

HOUSE BILL 1272 3
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Commission; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations as provided in the State budget.
(g) The Commission shall:
(1) study evidence–based policies and practices for maximizing safety for
youth athletes at different age levels, with a concentration on youth athletes who are under
the age of 15 years, and stages of brain development based on national research;
(2) seek input from nationally recognized youth sports oversight
organizations, including US Youth Soccer, USA Cheer, US Lacrosse, and USA Football;
(3) study ways to reduce injury risk levels to youth athletes at different
ages; and
(4) make recommendations for implementation of evidence–based best
practices for minimizing injury risk for youth athletes.
(h) On or before December 31, 2026, the Commission shall submit a report of its
findings and recommendations to the Governor, the State Board of Education, the
Maryland Department of Health, and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government
Article, the General Assembly.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025. It shall remain effective for a period of 5 years and, at the end of September
30, 2030, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect.